Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.590

Dismissal of municipal employees during World War II—Redress—Limitations.

Under the system of redress authorized under RCW 41.04.580 through 41.04.595:

(1) A municipality may determine in its sole discretion the monetary amount of redress for salary and other employment related losses, which may not exceed five thousand dollars for any undivided claim.

(2) If a municipality adopts an ordinance or resolution providing for redress of salary and other employment related losses, it has no obligation to notify directly any person of possible eligibility for redress of salary and other employment related losses.

[ 1986 c 225 s 4.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Severability—1986 c 225: See notes following RCW 41.04.580.